utilities/dictionaries/lb_LB-Luxembourgish.aff
FLAG long
SFX i0 N 38
SFX i0 ach ächen/c0 ach is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 mann fra/n0 mann is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 ach ächin/n9 ach is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 ach ächen/c0 ach is:m2f is:feminine is:singular is:plural
SFX i0 ënz inzessin/n9 ënz is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 boy girl/n0 boy is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 ek igin/n9 ek is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 ott ëttin/n9 ott is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 dd ttesch/n0 add is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 -duc e-duchesse/n4 -duc is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 -Duc e-Duchesse/n4 -Duc is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 jong meedchen/d0 jong is:neutral is:m2f is:singular
SFX i0 f win/n9 if is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 o a/n0 [^d]o is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 udd iddin/n9 udd is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 of äfin/n9 of is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 udd üddin/n9 udd is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 ous éisin/n9 ous is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 papp mamm/n0 papp is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 p m/n0 [Bb]op is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 pi mi/n0 opi is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 pa ma/n0 pa is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 oopst eepstin/n9 oopst is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 ochs échsin/n9 ochs is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 oer éiesch/n0 oer is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 monni tatta/n0 monni is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 brudder schwëster/n0 brudder is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 pätter giedel/n0 pätter is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 pätter gued/n0 pätter is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 king queen/n0 king is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 här damm/n0 här is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 guy girl/n0 guy is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 daddy momma/n0 daddy is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 kter ctrice/n4 kter is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 Abt Äbtissin/n9 Abt is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 arm rmette/n4 arm is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 ter s/n0 ster is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i0 männchen frächen/d0 männchen is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX d2 N 3
SFX d2 dchen tercher dchen is:plural
SFX d2 nchen tercher nchen is:plural
SFX d2 n 0 . is:eifeler

SFX f9 N 3
SFX f9 0 fin/n9 f is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f9 k ckin/n9 k is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX f9 0 tin/n9 t is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX s0 N 1
SFX s0 0 s .

SFX n9 N 2
SFX n9 0 nen . is:plural
SFX n9 0 ne . is:plural is:eifeler

SFX i1 N 10
SFX i1 0 sse/n4 [^e]e is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 ësch/n0 ee is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 hesse/n4 c is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 nin/n9 ao is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 ess/n0 d is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 a/n0 or is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 ess/n0 ron is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 na/n0 Don is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 efra/n0 er is:m2f is:feminine is:singular
SFX i1 0 fra/n0 mo is:m2f is:feminine is:singular

SFX u2 N 2
SFX u2 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX u2 0 ter . is:plural

SFX v4 N 36
SFX v4 éien ouch schéien is:pre is:3ps
SFX v4 éien ouchen/c0 schéien is:pre is:3pp
SFX v4 n 0 n is:eifeler
SFX v4 annen ënnt annen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 afen eeft afen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 oen eet oen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 oen oungen/c0 [gt]oen is:pre is:3pp
SFX v4 oen oung [gt]oen is:pre is:3ps
SFX v4 oen éingen/c0 [gt]oen is:cond is:3pp
SFX v4 oen éing [gt]oen is:cond is:3ps
SFX v4 oen inn/c0 [gt]oen is:ip is:3pp
SFX v4 ommen ënnt ommen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 mmen umen/c0 mmen is:pre is:3pp
SFX v4 mmen um mmen is:pre is:3ps
SFX v4 ommen éimen/c0 ommen is:cond is:3pp
SFX v4 ommen éim ommen is:cond is:3ps
SFX v4 uessen iisst uessen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 alen ält alen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 wen ft [^l]wen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 eiwen ouwen/c0 eiwen is:pre is:3pp
SFX v4 eiwen oufen/c0 eiwen is:pre is:3pp
SFX v4 eiwen éiwen/c0 eiwen is:cond is:3pp
SFX v4 eiwen ouf eiwen is:pre is:3ps
SFX v4 eiwen éif eiwen is:cond is:3ps
SFX v4 éien itt éien is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 0 0 . is:ip is:3pp
SFX v4 n 0 n is:ip is:3pp is:eifeler
SFX v4 alen oulen/c0 alen is:pre is:3pp
SFX v4 alen oul alen is:pre is:3ps
SFX v4 alen éilen/c0 alen is:cond is:3pp
SFX v4 alen éil alen is:cond is:3ps
SFX v4 en t soen is:pre is:3ps
SFX v4 en ten/c0 soen is:pre is:3pp
SFX v4 effen ëfft effen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 alwen left alwen is:ip is:3ps
SFX v4 angen éngt angen is:ip is:3ps

SFX X0 N 9
SFX X0 en t/a0 [^djrtw]en is:adjective is:papa
SFX X0 den t/a0 [^d]den is:adjective is:papa
SFX X0 dden tt/a0 dden is:adjective is:papa
SFX X0 en t/a0 [^äio]ren is:adjective is:papa
SFX X0 ren ert/a0 [äio]ren is:adjective is:papa
SFX X0 ën t/a0 ën is:adjective is:papa
SFX X0 jen cht/a0 jen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X0 wen ft/a0 wen is:adjective is:papa
SFX X0 en 0/a0 ten is:adjective is:papa

SFX e1 N 55
SFX e1 aach iech aach is:plural
SFX e1 ad ied ad is:plural
SFX e1 n 0 en is:eifeler
SFX e1 am eem am is:plural
SFX e1 um im um is:plural
SFX e1 us is aus is:plural
SFX e1 ag eeg ag is:plural
SFX e1 en ng een is:plural
SFX e1 d n nd is:plural
SFX e1 af ief [ht]af is:plural
SFX e1 af eef [^ht]af is:plural
SFX e1 aasch eesch aasch is:plural
SFX e1 uedem iedem uedem is:plural
SFX e1 ugel igel ugel is:plural
SFX e1 uechter iechter uechter is:plural
SFX e1 od eed od is:plural
SFX e1 op eep op is:plural
SFX e1 uef ief uef is:plural
SFX e1 ut it ut is:plural
SFX e1 k g nk is:plural
SFX e1 oopst eepst oopst is:plural
SFX e1 usch isch usch is:plural
SFX e1 of eef of is:plural
SFX e1 ol eel ol is:plural
SFX e1 on een on is:plural
SFX e1 ub ibb ub is:plural
SFX e1 uch ich uch is:plural
SFX e1 udder idder udder is:plural
SFX e1 ued ied ued is:plural
SFX e1 uerf ierf uerf is:plural
SFX e1 uerm ierm uerm is:plural
SFX e1 uerz ierz uerz is:plural
SFX e1 uewen iewen/c0 uewen is:plural
SFX e1 uff iff uff is:plural
SFX e1 ull ill ull is:plural
SFX e1 umm imm umm is:plural
SFX e1 unn inn unn is:plural
SFX e1 utsch itsch utsch is:plural
SFX e1 utt itt utt is:plural
SFX e1 uuss iiss uuss is:plural
SFX e1 uet iet uet is:plural
SFX e1 ummer immer ummer is:plural
SFX e1 our ier our is:plural
SFX e1 uer ier uer is:plural
SFX e1 upp ipp upp is:plural
SFX e1 mënsch leit mënsch is:plural
SFX e1 u i u is:plural
SFX e1 us i [dl]us is:plural
SFX e1 om eem om is:plural
SFX e1 o ee [^lst]o is:plural
SFX e1 Uewen Iewen/c0 Uewen is:plural
SFX e1 Aasch Eesch Aasch is:plural
SFX e1 o i [lst]o is:plural
SFX e1 persoun leit persoun is:plural
SFX e1 k it uk is:plural
